Idaho, session 2025, H0109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-275, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-275. WAIVER TO ENHANCE NUTRITION IN THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION AS-
SISTANCE PROGRAM. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or
artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or
other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or pieces.
"Candy" shall not include any preparation containing flour and shall
require no refrigeration.
(b) "Soda" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or ar-
tificial sweeteners. "Soda" does not include any beverages that con-
tain milk or milk substitutes, that are greater than fifty percent (50%)
vegetable juice or fruit juice by volume, or that require preparation
before consumption, such as powders or concentrates.
(2) The director of the department of health and welfare shall request a
waiver from the United States department of agriculture to exclude candy and
soda from the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2. If such waiver
is granted, then the director shall prohibit the purchase of candy and soda
with benefits provided through the supplemental nutrition assistance pro-
gram. If no such waiver is granted, then the director shall request such a
waiver annually until such waiver is granted.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.